Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXV Domestic Relations
Penalties

402.990.
Penalties.

Any party to a marriage prohibited by KRS

402.010

shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor. If the parties continue after conviction to cohabit as man and wife, either or both of them shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who aids or abets the marriage of any person who has been adjudged mentally disabled, or attempts to marry, or aids or abets any attempted marriage with any such person shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

Any authorized person who knowingly solemnizes a marriage prohibited by this chapter shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any unauthorized person who solemnizes a marriage under pretense of having authority, and any person who falsely personates the father, mother, or guardian of an applicant in obtaining a license shall be guilty of a Class D felony.

Any person who falsely and fraudulently represents or personates another, and in such assumed character marries that person, shall be guilty of a Class D felony. Indictment under this subsection shall be found only upon complaint of the injured party and within two (2) years after the commission of the offense.

Any clerk who knowingly issues a marriage license to any persons prohibited by this chapter from marrying shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and removed from office by the judgment of the court in which he is convicted.

Any clerk who knowingly issues a marriage license in violation of his duty under this chapter shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

If any deputy clerk or any person other than a county clerk knowingly issues a marriage license in violation of this chapter, but not for a prohibited marriage, he shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor, and if he knowingly issues a license for a marriage prohibited by this chapter, he shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of KRS

402.090

shall be guilty of a violation.

Any county clerk who violates any of the provisions of KRS

402.110

or

402.230

shall be guilty of a violation.

Any person failing to make the return required of him by KRS

402.220

shall be guilty of a violation.

History.

216aa-50, 1209, 1210, 2103, 2103a, 2104, 2105a-2c, 2105a-5, 2107, 2109 to 2112, 2114: amend. Acts 1970, ch. 92, § 94; 1972, ch. 122, § 5; 1974, ch. 273, § 2; 1978, ch. 92, § 13, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 519, effective June 17, 1978; 1982, ch. 141, § 114, effective July 1, 1982; 1982, ch. 146, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1992, ch. 463, § 45, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 205, § 2, effective July 15, 1996.